Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 2
DIVISION OF GAMING

44-30-201. Division of gaming - creation.

There is created in the department the division of gaming, the head of which is the director of the division of gaming. The director is appointed by, and may be removed by, the executive director. The division of gaming, the Colorado limited gaming control commission created in section 44-30-301, and the director of the division of gaming are type 2 entities, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercise their respective powers and perform their respective duties and functions as specified in this article 30 under the department; except that the commission has full and exclusive authority to promulgate rules related to limited gaming and sports betting without any approval by, or delegation of authority from, the department. Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection (1) to the contrary, sports betting is not authorized unless the voters at the November 2019 statewide election approve the ballot question submitted pursuant to section 44-30-1514, enacted in 2019 in House Bill 19-1327.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 174, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1327), ch. 347, p. 3210, § 4, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3362, § 35, effective August 10.

44-30-202. Functions of division - repeal.

The functions of the division are to license, implement, regulate, and supervise the conduct in this state of:

Limited gaming as authorized by section 9 of article XVIII of the state constitution; and

Sports betting as authorized by part 15 of this article 30.

This subsection (1)(b) is repealed, effective September 1, 2020, if the voters at the November 2019 statewide election do not approve the question described in section 44-30-1514 and the governor issues an official declaration of the vote thereon.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, sports betting is not authorized unless the voters at the November 2019 statewide election approve the ballot question submitted pursuant to section 44-30-1514, enacted in 2019 in House Bill 19-1327.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 175, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1327), ch. 347, p. 3211, § 5, effective August 2.

44-30-203. Director - qualification - powers and duties.

The director shall:

Be qualified by training and experience to direct the work of the division;

Be of good character and shall not have been convicted of any felony or gambling-related offense, notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-5-101;

Not be engaged in any other profession or occupation that could present a conflict of interest to the director's duties as director of the division; and

Direct and supervise the administrative and technical activities of the division.

In addition to the duties imposed upon the director elsewhere in this part 2 and in parts 15 and 16 of this article 30, the director shall:

Supervise and administer the operation of the division, limited gaming, and sports betting in accordance with this article 30 and the rules of the commission;

Supervise and administer the regulation of fantasy contest operators in accordance with part 16 of this article 30, including the establishment of fees for registration of small fantasy contest operators under section 44-30-1605 and fees for licensing, renewal, and reinstatement of licenses of fantasy contest operators under section 44-30-1606;

Attend meetings of the commission or appoint a designee to attend in the director's place;

Employ and direct any personnel as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this article 30, but no person shall be employed who has been convicted of a felony or gambling-related offense, notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-5-101.

The director, with the approval of the commission, may enter into agreements with any department, agency, or unit of state government to secure services that the director deems necessary and to provide for the payment for the services and may employ and compensate the consultants and technical assistants as may be required and as otherwise permitted by law.

Confer with the commission as necessary or desirable, but not less than once each month, with regard to the operation of the division;

Make available for inspection by the commission or any member of the commission, upon request, all books, records, files, and other information and documents in the director's office;

Advise the commission and recommend to the commission any rules and other procedures as the director deems necessary and advisable to improve the operation of the division and the conduct of limited gaming or sports betting;

With the concurrence of the commission or pursuant to commission requirements and procedures, enter into contracts for materials, equipment, and supplies to be used in the operation of the division;

Make a continuous study and investigation of the operation and the administration of similar laws that may be in effect in other states or countries; of any literature on gaming or sports betting that from time to time may be published or available; and of any federal laws that may affect the operation of the division, the conduct of limited gaming or sports betting, or the reaction of Colorado citizens to limited gaming or sports betting with a view to recommending or effecting changes that would serve the purposes of this article 30;

Furnish to the commission a monthly report that contains a full and complete statement of the division's revenue and expenses for each month.

All reports required by this subsection (2)(i) shall be public, and copies of all the reports shall be sent to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, the minority leaders of both houses, and the executive director.

Annually prepare and submit to the commission, for its approval, a proposed budget for the next succeeding fiscal year, setting forth a complete financial plan for all proposed expenditures and anticipated revenues of the division;

Take any action as may be determined by the commission to be necessary to protect the security and integrity of limited gaming or sports betting; and

Perform any other lawful acts that the commission may consider necessary or desirable in order to carry out the purposes and provisions of this article 30.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 175, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

IP(2), (2)(a), (2)(f), (2)(h), and (2)(k) amended, (HB 19-1327), ch. 347, p. 3211, § 6, effective May 1, 2020.

L. 2020:

IP(2) amended and (2)(a.5) added, (HB 20-1286), ch. 269, p. 1313, § 12, effective July 10.

44-30-204. Investigator - peace officers.

All investigators of the division and their supervisors, including the director and the executive director, have all the powers of any peace officer to:

Make arrests, with or without warrant, for any violation of this article 30, article 20 of title 18, or the rules promulgated pursuant to this article 30, any other laws or rules pertaining to the conduct of limited gaming or sports betting in this state, or any criminal law of this state, if, during an officer's exercise of powers or performance of duties under this section, probable cause is established that a violation of any said law or rule has occurred;

Inspect, examine, investigate, hold, or impound any premises where limited gaming or sports betting is conducted, any devices or equipment designed for or used in limited gaming or sports betting, and any books and records in any way connected with any limited gaming or sports betting activity;

Require any person licensed pursuant to this article 30, upon demand, to permit an inspection of his or her licensed premises, gaming equipment and devices, or books or records; and to permit the testing and the seizure for testing or examination purposes of all devices, equipment, and books and records;

Serve all warrants, notices, summonses, or other processes relating to the enforcement of laws regulating limited gaming or sports betting;

Serve distraint warrants issued by the department pertaining to limited gaming or sports betting;

Conduct investigations into the character, record, and reputation of all applicants for limited gaming or sports betting licenses, all licensees, and any other persons as the commission may determine pertaining to limited gaming or sports betting;

Investigate violations of all the laws pertaining to limited gaming, sports betting, and activities related to both;

Assist or aid any sheriff or other peace officer in the performance of his or her duties upon the sheriff's or peace officer's request or the request of other local officials having jurisdiction.

Criminal violations of this article 30 discovered during an authorized investigation or discovered by the commission shall be referred to the appropriate district attorney.

The investigators of the division, including the director of the division, shall be considered peace officers, as described in sections 16-2.5-101 and 16-2.5-123. The executive director shall be considered a peace officer as described in sections 16-2.5-101 and 16-2.5-121.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit local sheriffs, police departments, and other local law enforcement agencies from enforcing the provisions of this article 30, and the rules promulgated pursuant to this article 30, or from performing their other duties to the full extent permitted by law. All sheriffs, police officers, district attorneys, and other local law enforcement agencies shall have all the powers set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 176, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(b), and (1)(d) to (1)(g) amended, (HB 19-1327), ch. 347, p. 3212, § 7, effective May 1, 2020.

44-30-205. Division of gaming - access to records.

The division of gaming, for purposes of this article 30, shall have full authority to procure, at the expense of the division, any records furnished to or maintained by any law enforcement agency in the United States, including state and local law enforcement agencies in Colorado and other states for the purposes of carrying out its responsibilities pursuant to this article 30. Upon request from the Colorado bureau of investigation, the division shall provide copies of any and all information obtained pursuant to this article 30.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 178, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-205 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-206. Repeal of division - review of functions.

This part 2 is repealed, effective September 1, 2033. Before the repeal, the division of gaming is scheduled for review in accordance with section 24-34-104.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 178, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1412), ch. 405, p. 2874, § 2, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-206 as it existed prior to 2018.